Vermont, session 2025-2026, S232.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Findings * * *
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) The State of Vermont and its communities depend on libraries as
centers for learning, social connection, technological access, disaster
preparedness and response, support of health care and social services, and
numerous other vital services.
(2) As places of public accommodation, public libraries are obligated to
ensure that their services, facilities, and resources are inclusive and accessible
to all. However, many of Vermont’s existing library facilities require
improvements in order to fulfill this obligation and meet programming needs.
(3) Early literacy is integral to student preparedness and success.
Vermont’s Department of Libraries and statewide network of public libraries
are uniquely suited to play a critical role in improving the literacy skills of
students throughout the State.
(4) It is essential that the State raise awareness about public libraries and
their offerings in order to ensure their continued beneficial impact and
continued accessibility for all Vermont residents.
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 2 of 7
2026
(5) For more than 125 years, public libraries have provided diverse
afterschool and summer programs and literacy opportunities to all children free
of charge. These programs often include literacy, arts, technology, or science
education; nutritious meals; and creative recreational activities.
* * * Vermont Libraries Day * * *
Sec. 2. 1 V.S.A. § 379 is added to read:
§ 379. VERMONT LIBRARIES DAY
The third Monday in the month of October is designated as “Vermont
Libraries Day.”
* * * Afterschool, Summer Reading, and Early Education Funding for Public
Libraries * * *
Sec. 3. 16 V.S.A. § 51 is amended to read:
§ 51. UNIVERSAL AFTERSCHOOL AND SUMMER SPECIAL FUND
(a) The Universal Afterschool and Summer Special Fund is created, to be
managed by the Agency of Education. The cannabis sales tax revenue shall be
deposited into the Universal Afterschool and Summer Special Fund. The Fund
shall be used as follows:
(1) To establish a grant program that supports the expansion of
sustaining or expanding universal afterschool and summer programs with a
focus on underserved areas of the State.
(2) Cannabis sales tax revenue shall be used to support a mixed delivery
system for afterschool and summer programming. Eligible recipients can be
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 3 of 7
2026
public, private, or nonprofit organizations, including public libraries, schools,
and volunteer mentoring programs. The Agency may allocate a portion of the
funds annually to the Department of Libraries for the purpose of providing
subgrants to public libraries to sustain or create summer and afterschool
programming. A coalition or group of public libraries may also apply for a
grant from the Agency or Department.
* * *
(E) The Agency shall create a simple application and reporting
process that reduces barriers to grant program participation for small,
community-based organizations, such as rural public libraries, volunteer
mentoring programs, and similar organizations.
(b) An advisory committee is created to support the Secretary in
administering the funds. The Agency shall provide administrative and
technical support to the advisory committee. The advisory committee shall be
composed of:
* * *
(7) the Vermont Afterschool Executive Director or designee; and
(8) a representative from the Governor’s office; and
(9) the State Librarian or designee.
* * *
(e) Annually, the advisory committee shall solicit public input on the grant
program and procedures established pursuant to this section. The advisory
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 4 of 7
2026
committee shall hold a meeting to discuss the public input and any plans to
implement recommended changes to the grant program.
Sec. 4. 16 V.S.A. § 4014 is amended to read:
§ 4014. EARLY EDUCATION
(a) The Secretary may grant funds for voluntary early education programs.
The funds may be used for personnel costs, training of parents and staff,
materials and educational equipment, and other costs related to early education
programs, including training for public library staff.
(b) The Secretary shall solicit proposals for early education programs from
community organizations serving young children. Community organizations
include school districts; public libraries; other public agencies, including Head
Start programs; and private agencies, including child care programs and
parent-child centers.
* * *
* * * Department of Libraries; Duties * * *
Sec. 5. 22 V.S.A. § 605 is amended to read:
§ 605. DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
LIBRARIES
The duties and functions of the Department of Libraries shall be to provide,
administer, and maintain:
* * *
(2) A digital or physical collection of federal documents.
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 5 of 7
2026
(3) An information and reference service to State government, including
a comprehensive digital or physical collection of current information relating
to matters of public policy and topics pertinent to State government.
(4) A general library collection of a sufficient size and scope to
reinforce and supplement the resources of local and regional libraries. All
materials of the Department of Libraries The collection may be composed of
digital and physical materials and shall be available for free circulation to all
citizens, institutions, and organizations under procedures adopted by the State
Librarian except that the State Librarian may restrict rare or reference-type
materials to one location. The Department shall arrange, classify, and catalog
all materials in its custody and provide for their safekeeping and shall rebind
books as needed. The Department shall provide service materials to other
libraries in the State, schools, and individuals and may provide service by mail
or book wagon or otherwise through interlibrary loan and shall encourage the
sharing of library materials between libraries in Vermont and nationally
through interlibrary loan.
(5) A service of advice and consultation to all libraries in the State, in
order to assist them in realizing their potential. This service shall be provided
at a regional level as well as at the State level. The Department may provide
centralized cataloging and other related technical services to libraries in the
State to the extent feasible.
* * *
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 6 of 7
2026
Sec. 6. 22 V.S.A. § 143 is amended to read:
§ 143. TRUSTEES
(a) Unless a municipality that has established or shall establish a public
library votes at its annual meeting to elect a board of trustees, the governing
body of the municipality shall appoint the trustees. The appointment or
election of the trustees shall continue in effect until changed at an annual
meeting of the municipality. When trustees are first chosen, they shall be
elected or appointed for staggered terms. This subsection shall not be
construed to apply to public libraries that are privately established, chartered,
or incorporated pursuant to subchapter 2 of this chapter.
* * *
* * * Municipal Bonds; Improvements to Public Libraries * * *
Sec. 7. 24 V.S.A. § 1752a is amended to read:
§ 1752a. PUBLIC LIBRARIES; PRIVATELY OWNED MUNICIPALITY-
SUPPORTED LIBRARIES
By a majority vote of those present and voting at an annual or special
meeting warned for the purpose, a municipality may issue municipal bonds
under this chapter for the cost of capital improvements to any public library, as
defined in 22 V.S.A. § 101, including any privately owned municipality-
supported library situated within the municipality for use of residents of the
municipality; and such the improvements shall be considered “improvements”
for the purposes of this chapter.
VT LEG #390171 v.1

No. 127 Page 7 of 7
2026
* * * Repeal * * *
Sec. 8. REPEAL
22 V.S.A. § 608 (Audio-Visual Revolving Fund) is repealed.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 8, 2026
VT LEG #390171 v.1